Utah statutes.
9-4-508.   Issuing authorities -- Limitations -- Duties.

(1) (a)  Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, an issuing authority issuing bonds without a certificate of allocation issued under Section 9-4-507, or an issuing authority issuing bonds after the expiration of a certificate of allocation, is not entitled to an allocation of the volume cap for those bonds. 

(b)  An issuing authority issuing bonds in excess of the amount set forth in the related certificate of allocation is not entitled to an allocation of the volume cap for the excess.

(2)  Each issuing authority shall:

(a)  advise the board of review, within 15 days after the issuance of bonds, of the principal amount of bonds issued under each certificate of allocation by delivering to the board of review a copy of the Form 8038 that was delivered or shall be delivered to the Internal Revenue Service in connection with the bonds, or, if no Form 8038 is required to be delivered to the Internal Revenue Service, a completed copy of a Form 8038 prepared for the board of review with respect to the bonds; and

(b)  if all or a stated portion of the bonds for which a certificate of allocation was received will not be issued, advise the board of review in writing, within 15 days of the earlier of:

(i)  the final decision not to issue all or a stated portion of the bonds; or

(ii)  the expiration of the certificate of allocation.

(3)  Failure by an issuing authority to notify the board of review under Subsection (2), including failure to timely deliver a Form 8038, may, in the sole discretion of the board of review, result in the issuing authority being denied further consideration of applications.

